Tennessee, session 114, SB1720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-5-102, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) Notwithstanding § 10-7-503, the addresses on a nominating petition for the
office of judge, chancellor, district attorney general, and public defender are confidential
and are not open to public inspection.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(f)(1), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Except as provided in § 10-7-503(f), the application materials submitted by
an individual when seeking employment with the governmental entity.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1720
011286
- 1 -